New York, session 2025-2026, S6246.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 689 of the laws of 1993 amending the 2 criminal procedure law relating to electronic court appearance in 3 certain counties, as amended by section 18 of part A of chapter 55 of 4 the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately, except that the 6 provisions of this act shall be deemed to have been in full force and 7 effect since July 1, 1992 [and the provisions of this act shall expire 8 September 1, 2025 when upon such date the provisions of this act shall 9 be deemed repealed]. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02073-01-5